Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.289

Commission speaks for state—Director's oversight.

Each commission organized under a marketing order adopted under this chapter exists primarily for the benefit of the people of the state of Washington and its economy. The legislature hereby charges each commission, with oversight by the director, to speak on behalf of Washington state government with regard to its particular commodity.

[ 2003 c 396 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.